District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.07

Unauthorized disclosure of records.

Whoever willfully discloses, receives, makes use of or knowingly permits the use of confidential information concerning a child or individual in violation of this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than $1,000. A violation of this section shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III, § 307
as added Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-29, § 2, 26 DCR 678
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 4-1303.08, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-6, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2479).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 4-1303.08, see § 2(b) of the Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-491, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 57).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 6-2128 1981 Ed., see § 2(b) of the Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-428, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7451).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-215, April 3, 2001, law notification 38 DCR 3457).
1973 Ed., § 6-2137.
1981 Ed., § 6-2127.